Louisiana, session 2026, SB25.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:55(A)(1), (2), and (4)(b), and (C), 59(B)(1), (2), and (4)(b), and
(C)(1), (2), and (4)(b), and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:55(G) and
59(N) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§55. Compensation of registrar of voters; amount and manner of payment; reduction
during tenure prohibited; prohibited increase
A.(1) The annual salary of registrars of voters shall be based on the most
recent population figures as shown by the latest federal decennial census, the
Louisiana Tech University population estimates for Louisiana parishes published
pursuant to the United States Bureau of the Census Federal-State Cooperative
Program for Population Estimates, or as determined by the governing authority
of each parish in accordance with law.
(2) The salary ranges and pay schedule for the registrars shall be as follows:
Population Range Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
0 to 40,000 $57,769 $59,502 $61,287 $63,126
40,001 to 60,000 $64,188 $66,113 $68,097 $70,140
60,001 to 100,000 $70,607 $72,725 $74,907 $77,154
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
100,001 to 200,000 $77,026 $79,337 $81,717 $84,168
200,001 to 1,000,000 $83,445 $85,948 $88,526 $91,182
0 to 50,000 $69,597 $71,640 $73,744 $75,941
50,001 to 200,000 $83,217 $85,668 $88,193 $90,794
200,001 to 1,000,000 $90,026 $92,682 $95,418 $98,235
Population Range Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8
0 to 40,000 $65,019 $66,970 $68,979 $71,049
40,001 to 60,000 $72,244 $74,441 $76,644 $78,943
60,001 to 100,000 $79,469 $81,853 $84,309 $86,838
100,001 to 200,000 $86,693 $89,294 $91,973 $94,732
200,001 to 1,000,000 $93,918 $96,735 $99,637 $102,626
0 to 50,000 $78,144 $80,443 $82,811 $85,251
50,001 to 200,000 $93,473 $96,232 $99,074 $102,001
200,001 to 1,000,000 $101,137 $104,126 $107,205 $110,376
Population Range Step 9 Step 10 Step 11 Step 12
0 to 40,000 $73,180 $75,375 $77,637 $79,966
40,001 to 60,000 $81,311 $83,751 $86,263 $88,851
60,001 to 100,000 $89,443 $92,126 $94,890 $97,737
100,001 to 200,000 $97,574 $100,501 $103,516 $106,622
200,001 to 1,000,000 $105,705 $108,876 $112,143 $115,507
0 to 50,000 $87,763 $90,351 - -
50,001 to 200,000 $105,016 $108,122 - -
200,001 to 1,000,000 $113,643 $117,007 - -
* * *
(4)(a) * * *
(b) Each registrar whose salary is at the level of step one or higher shall be
evaluated as to merit in January. The merit evaluation shall result in a finding of
"excellent", "successful", "unsuccessful", or "not assessed". The criteria and
procedure for the merit evaluation shall be determined by the secretary of state in
conjunction with the Registrar of Voters Association. Each registrar shall be
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
evaluated by the secretary of state or his designee acting on his behalf. Upon a
finding of "excellent" on a merit evaluation, the registrar shall receive a salary
increase to the next step until the registrar's salary is equal to the highest step of the
appropriate population range. Any registrar whose salary has remained at the
level of step ten for more than twelve months shall receive a five percent salary
increase upon a finding of "excellent"on the merit evaluation. No registrar shall
receive more than five such annual salary increases. A registrar may appeal the
finding on a merit evaluation to the State Board of Election Supervisors in
accordance with rules promulgated by the board. If a member of the board
participates in the merit evaluation of a registrar, the member shall not participate in
an appeal of the evaluation.
* * *
C. The annual compensation of each registrar of voters shall be based upon
the most recent census taken by the United States Government, Louisiana Tech
University population estimates for Louisiana parishes, or upon the population
figures of each parish population figures as shown by the latest federal decennial
census, population estimates published pursuant to the United States Bureau of
the Census Federal-State Cooperative Program for Population Estimates, or as
determined by its the governing authority as provided by of each parish in
accordance with law.
* * *
G. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter to the contrary,
the Department of State shall not adjust the annual salary of registrars of voters
based on population changes except once decennially one year after receiving
the federal census.
* * *
§59. Deputies, confidential assistants, and other permanent office employees;
temporary employees; appointment and compensation; prohibited
increase in compensation
* * *
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
B.(1) The annual salary of the chief deputy registrar of voters in each parish
shall be based on the most recent population figures as shown by the latest federal
decennial census, the Louisiana Tech University population estimates for Louisiana
parishes published pursuant to the United States Bureau of the Census Federal-
State Cooperative Program for Population Estimates, or as determined by the
governing authority of each parish in accordance with law.
(2) The salary ranges and pay schedule for the chief deputy shall be as
follows:
Population Range Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
0 to 40,000 $33,697 $34,708 $35,750 $36,822
40,001 to 60,000 $40,117 $41,321 $42,560 $43,837
60,001 to 100,000 $46,537 $47,933 $49,371 $50,852
100,001 to 200,000 $52,956 $54,544 $56,181 $57,866
200,001 to 1,000,000 $59,375 $61,156 $62,991 $64,880
0 to 50,000 $44,060 $45,337 $46,652 $48,007
50,001 to 200,000 $57,681 $59,366 $61,102 $62,890
200,001 to 1,000,000 $64,491 $66,380 $68,327 $70,331
Population Range Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8
0 to 40,000 $37,927 $39,064 $40,236 $41,443
40,001 to 60,000 $45,152 $46,507 $47,902 $49,339
60,001 to 100,000 $52,378 $53,949 $55,568 $57,235
100,001 to 200,000 $59,602 $61,390 $63,232 $65,129
200,001 to 1,000,000 $66,827 $68,831 $70,896 $73,023
0 to 50,000 $49,402 $50,839 $52,319 $53,844
50,001 to 200,000 $64,732 $66,629 $68,583 $70,595
200,001 to 1,000,000 $72,396 $74,523 $76,714 $78,970
Population Range Step 9 Step 10 Step 11 Step 12
0 to 40,000 $42,687 $43,967 $45,286 $46,645
40,001 to 60,000 $50,819 $52,344 $53,914 $55,532
60,001 to 100,000 $58,952 $60,720 $62,542 $64,418
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
100,001 to 200,000 $67,083 $69,095 $71,168 $73,303
200,001 to 1,000,000 $75,214 $77,470 $79,795 $82,188
0 to 50,000 $55,414 $57,032 - -
50,001 to 200,000 $72,668 $74,803 - -
200,001 to 1,000,000 $81,295 $83,688 - -
* * *
(4)(a) * * *
(b) Each chief deputy whose salary is at the level of step one or higher shall
be evaluated as to merit in January. The merit evaluation shall result in a finding of
"excellent", "successful", "unsuccessful", or "not assessed". The criteria and
procedure for the merit evaluation shall be determined by the Registrar of Voters
Association. It shall provide that each chief deputy will be evaluated by the registrar
of his parish. Upon a finding of "excellent" on a merit evaluation, the chief deputy
shall receive a salary increase to the next step until his salary equals the highest step
of the appropriate population range. Any chief deputy whose salary has remained
at the level of step ten for more than twelve months shall receive a five percent
salary increase upon a finding of "excellent"on the merit evaluation. No chief
deputy shall receive more than five such annual salary increases.
C.(1) The annual salary of the confidential assistant to the registrar of voters
in each parish shall be based on the most recent population figures as shown by the
latest federal decennial census, the Louisiana Tech University population estimates
for Louisiana parishes published pursuant to the United States Bureau of the
Census Federal-State Cooperative Program for Population Estimates, or as
determined by the governing authority of each parish in accordance with law.
(2) The salary ranges and pay schedule for the confidential assistant shall be
as follows:
Population Range Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4
0 to 40,000 $27,281 $28,099 $28,942 $29,810
40,001 to 60,000 $33,699 $34,710 $35,751 $36,823
60,001 to 100,000 $40,117 $41,321 $42,560 $43,837
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
100,001 to 200,000 $46,537 $47,933 $49,371 $50,852
200,001 to 1,000,000 $52,956 $54,544 $56,181 $57,866
0 to 50,000 $37,251 $38,323 $39,428 $40,566
50,001 to 200,000 $50,871 $52,352 $53,878 $55,449
200,001 to 1,000,000 $57,681 $59,366 $61,102 $62,890
Population Range Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8
0 to 40,000 $30,704 $31,626 $32,574 $33,552
40,001 to 60,000 $37,928 $39,066 $40,238 $41,445
60,001 to 100,000 $45,152 $46,507 $47,902 $49,339
100,001 to 200,000 $52,378 $53,949 $55,568 $57,235
200,001 to 1,000,000 $59,602 $61,390 $63,232 $65,129
0 to 50,000 $41,738 $42,945 $44,188 $45,469
50,001 to 200,000 $57,068 $58,735 $60,452 $62,220
200,001 to 1,000,000 $64,732 $66,629 $68,583 $70,595
Population Range Step 9 Step 10 Step 11 Step 12
0 to 40,000 $34,558 $35,595 $36,663 $37,763
40,001 to 60,000 $42,688 $43,969 $45,288 $46,647
60,001 to 100,000 $50,819 $52,344 $53,914 $55,532
100,001 to 200,000 $58,952 $60,720 $62,542 $64,418
200,001 to 1,000,000 $67,083 $69,095 $71,168 $73,303
0 to 50,000 $46,788 $48,147 - -
50,001 to 200,000 $64,042 $65,918 - -
200,001 to 1,000,000 $72,668 $74,803 - -
* * *
(4)(a) * * *
(b) Each confidential assistant whose salary is at the level of step one or
higher shall be evaluated as to merit in January. The merit evaluation shall result in
a finding of "excellent", "successful", "unsuccessful", or "not assessed". The criteria
and procedure for the merit evaluation shall be determined by the Registrar of Voters
Association. It shall provide that each confidential assistant be evaluated by the
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
registrar of his parish. Upon a finding of "excellent" on a merit evaluation, the
confidential assistant shall receive a salary increase to the next step until the
confidential assistant's salary is equal to the highest step of the appropriate
population range. Any confidential assistant whose salary has remained at the
level of step ten for more than twelve months shall receive a five percent salary
increase upon a finding of "excellent"on the merit evaluation. No confidential
assistant shall receive more than five such annual salary increases.
* * *
E. The annual compensation of each chief deputy registrar of voters and
confidential assistant shall be based upon the most recent census taken by the United
States Government, the Louisiana Tech University population estimates for
Louisiana parishes, upon the population figures of each parish population figures
as shown by the latest federal decennial census, population estimates published
pursuant to the United States Bureau of the Census Federal-State Cooperative
Program for Population Estimates, or as determined by its governing authority as
provided by of each parish in accordance with law.
* * *
N. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter to the contrary,
the Department of State shall not adjust the annual salaries of the chief deputy
registrars of voters and confidential assistant to the registrars of voters based
on population changes except once decennially one year after receiving the
federal census.
Section 2. R.S. 24:35.1(33), (34), and (35) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§35.1. Membership of the Senate
The Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana shall be composed of thirty-nine
members. The state shall be divided into the following senatorial districts and one
senator shall be chosen from each of the districts:
* * *
(33) District 33 is composed of Precincts 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 3-1, and 3-7 of
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
Bienville Parish; Claiborne Parish; Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4,
4-5, 5-2, and 6-2 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 23, 26-1, 27, 29, 32, 35, 39-1, 40, 42,
45, 47, 48, and 50 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 35, 36, 37,
41, 43, 44, 44A, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 53, and 76 of Ouachita Parish; Union Parish;
Precincts 1, 2, 2B, 3, 4, 5, 6, 9, 10, and 14 of Webster Parish; and West Carroll
Parish. District 33 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 2-1, 2-2, 3-1, 3-6 and 3-7 of
Bienville Parish; Claiborne Parish; Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4,
4-5, 5-2 and 6-2 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 21, 23, 26-1, 27, 29, 32, 35, 39-1, 40,
42, 45, 47, 48, 51, 53 and 54 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7, 8,
9, 36, 41, 43, 44, 44A, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 53 and 76 of Ouachita Parish; Union
Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 3, 5, 6, 9, 9A, 10 and 14 of Webster Parish and West
Carroll Parish.
(34) District 34 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 4-3, 4-4, 5-1, 5-2,
and 5-2B of Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; Madison Parish; Precincts 1, 3-1,
6, 7, 8, 12, 13, 14, 16, 20, 21, 24, 31, 37, 39-2, 53, and 54 of Morehouse Parish;
Precincts 3, 5, 9A, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26,
65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74, and 79 of Ouachita Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 8,
10, 11, 12, 12A, 13, 17, 18, 23, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, and 35 of Richland
Parish; and Tensas Parish. District 34 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 4-3,
4-4 and 5-1 of Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; Madison Parish;
Precincts 1, 3-1, 6, 7, 8, 12, 13, 14, 16, 20, 24, 31, 37 and 39-2 of Morehouse
Parish; Precincts 3, 5, 9A, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24,
25, 26, 60, 65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74 and 79 of Ouachita Parish;
Precincts 1, 2, 8, 10, 11, 12, 12B, 13, 17, 18, 23, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34
and 35 of Richland Parish and Tensas Parish.
(35) District 35 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3,
6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, and 8-4 of Grant Parish; Precincts
1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5A, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 8A, 9, 10, 10A, 11, 11A, 13, 13A, 15, and 22 of Jackson
Parish; Precincts 4-6, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-3, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2, and 10-3 of Lincoln
Parish; Precincts 27, 27A, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 38, 39, 40, 42, 45, 46, 47, 48,
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
52, 52A, 54, 55, 56, 56A, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 75, 77, and 78 of Ouachita
Parish; Precincts N7, N14-A, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19, and N20 of
Rapides Parish; and Precincts 5-5, 6-3, 6-6, 7-2, and 7-7 of Winn Parish. District 35
is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4,
7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-5, 7-6, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3 and 8-4 of Grant Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4,
5, 5A, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 8A, 9, 10, 10A, 11, 11A, 13, 13A, 15 and 22 of Jackson Parish;
Precincts 4-6, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-3, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2 and 10-3 of Lincoln Parish;
Precincts 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 37, 38, 39, 40, 42, 45, 46, 47, 48, 52, 52A,
54, 55, 56, 56A, 59, 61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 75, 77 and 78 of Ouachita Parish; Precincts
N7, N14-A, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19 and N20 of Rapides Parish and
Precincts 5-5, 6-3, 6-6, 7-2 and 7-7 of Winn Parish.
* * *
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in Section 2 of this Act are those contained
in the file named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the
Legislature of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles
are based upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting
TIGER/Line Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and
validated through the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana
House of Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026,
to the Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of
R.S. 18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in Section 2 of this Act has been subdivided by
action of the parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action
of the parish governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions
of R.S. 18:532.1, the enumeration in Section 2 of this Act of the general precinct designation
shall include all nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such
subdivisions may be designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in Section 2 of this Act shall
continue in effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the
precincts by the parish governing authority.
Page 9 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 25 ENROLLED
Section 4. The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall not reduce the term of office
of any person holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which
the appointment or election is based upon a Senate district as composed pursuant to R.S.
24:35.1. Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a Senate
district and that is to be filled after the effective date of this Section, shall be appointed or
elected based upon the district as it is described in Section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026; if vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, Section 1 of
this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval by the legislature or July
1, 2026, whichever is later.
Section 6. This provisions of this Section and Sections 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this Act shall
become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and
subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.